Utah statutes.
16-6a-1419.   Deposit with state treasurer.

Assets of a dissolved nonprofit corporation that are to be transferred to a creditor, claimant, or member of the nonprofit corporation shall be reduced to cash and deposited with the state treasurer in accordance with Title 67, Chapter 4a, Unclaimed Property Act, if the creditor, claimant, or member:

(1)  cannot be found; or

(2)  is not legally competent to receive the assets.



Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

